District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.54

Trainees.

(a)

The Board shall issue rules regulating the duties and scope of the practice of pharmacy technician trainees.

(b)

The Board, through rulemaking, may require that pharmacy technician trainees register with the Board.

(c)

A pharmacy technician trainee shall not use a title other than pharmacy technician trainee and shall wear a name tag bearing the title “pharmacy technician trainee”.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 754
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711
This section is referenced in § 3-1207.52.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this section.